Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Cragfont

4-13-401. Purchase of property.

The Tennessee historical commission, as defined by chapter 11, part 1 of this title, is hereby authorized and empowered to use any funds appropriated or available to the commission to purchase and acquire a tract of land in Sumner County, on which is located Cragfont, the home of General James Winchester, for a sum not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

Acts 1957, ch. 268, § 2.

4-13-402. Expenditures for repair, restoration and renovation.

The Tennessee historical commission is authorized to expend any funds appropriated or available to it in the repair, renovation and restoration of the mansion house, Cragfont, and the improvement of the premises for use by the general public as a park, as picnic grounds, and for other related purposes.

The commission is authorized, in lieu of contracting itself for the repair, renovation and restoration of the mansion house, to authorize the Sumner County Chapter of the Association for the Preservation of Tennessee Antiquities to contract for same, within the limit of the funds set aside for such purpose, and to furnish the funds to the Sumner County Chapter of the Association for the Preservation of Tennessee Antiquities, to be used for that purpose, under such safeguards as the commission may prescribe.

Acts 1957, ch. 268, § 4; 1959, ch. 257, § 1.

4-13-403. [Reserved.]

The Tennessee historical commission shall hold legal title to the property, but is authorized and empowered to assign the actual custody and control of the property to a Tennessee not-for-profit corporation organized for the express purpose of restoring, maintaining and operating Cragfont; provided, that such not-for-profit corporation was in existence as of July 1, 1995. Any such corporation shall have the right to operate and manage the property on behalf of the Tennessee historical commission for the benefit of the general public, and to keep the property and improvements in a high state of improvement and repair, and to operate and maintain the grounds improved by the Tennessee historical commission in a manner consistent with such guidelines as may be promulgated by the Tennessee historical commission, or as the Tennessee historical commission shall contract with the corporation.

Acts 1957, ch. 268, § 5; 1997, ch. 32, § 1.

4-13-405. Continued operation as museum house.

It is the intent of this part that Cragfont shall continue to be operated as a museum house open to the general public and preserved for the citizens of Tennessee and future generations.

Acts 1957, ch. 268, § 6; 1997, ch. 32, § 1.